District of Columbia statutes.
31-1347

External audit of the receiver’s books.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may, as it deems desirable, order audits to be made of the books of the Commissioner relating to any receivership established under this chapter, and a report of each audit shall be filed with the Commissioner and with the court. The books, records, and other documents of the receivership shall be made available to the auditor at any time without notice. The expense of each audit shall be considered a cost of administration of the receivership.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 48, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-2847.